Delaware, session 153, HB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1913, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1913. Release and publication of the name and photograph of a juvenile. photograph. (a) As used in this section: (1) âJuvenileâ means a child 17 years of age or younger. (2) âLaw-enforcement officerâ means as defined in Â§ 222 of this title. (3) âLaw-enforcement agencyâ means any an agency employing law-enforcement officers. (4) âMugshotâ means a photograph of a suspectâs face or profile. (5) âName of juvenile â means the name of a juvenile an individual who has been arrested or suspected of committing a crime. crime or act of delinquency. (6) âPhotograph of a juvenileâ âPhotographâ means any an image depicting a juvenile an individual who has been arrested or suspected of committing a crime. crime or act of delinquency. âPhotograph of a juvenileâ âPhotographâ includes a mugshot. (7) âPublishâ means to disseminate to the public or produce or release for distribution. âPublishâ includes to display on any publicly-maintained social media page or website. (8) âReleaseâ means to make available or accessible to the public. (9) âViolent felonyâ means as defined in Â§ 4201 of this title. (b) No A law-enforcement agency shall may not release or publish or cause to be released or published the name of a juvenile or a photograph of a juvenile unless all of the following apply: (1) The juvenile is charged with a violent felony. (2) Release or publication of the photograph or name of the juvenile is necessary to protect the publicâs safety. (c) A law-enforcement agency may not release or publish or cause to be released or published the name or photograph of an adult suspected of or charged with a crime unless all of the following apply: (1) The individual is suspected of or charged with a felony. (2) Release or publication of the photograph or name of the individual is necessary to protect the publicâs safety.